Washington statutes.
RCW 40.06.070

Exemptions.

This chapter shall not apply to nor affect the duties concerning publications distributed by, or officers of:

(1) The state law library; and

(2) The statute law committee and the code reviser.

[ 1983 c 3 s 83; 1963 c 233 s 7.]